California, session 20252026, AB2531.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Both the California Constitution and the Health and Safety Code guarantee the right to abortion and contraception.(b) California is home to around 150,000 women veterans, representing nearly 11 percent of the state’s veteran population. Approximately one-third of California’s women veterans are of reproductive age. Women veterans are the fastest growing segment of the veteran community.(c) In 2022, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs promulgated a final rule that allowed the department to offer abortion counseling and abortions at department health care centers to pregnant veterans and Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Department of Veterans Affairs (CHAMPVA) beneficiaries when the patient’s life or health is threatened and in cases of rape or incest.(d) In December 2025, the department issued a memo and promulgated a final rule reversing the 2022 rule to exclude abortion and abortion counseling from the department’s medical benefits package and CHAMPVA coverage even in cases of rape and incest unless a physician certifies that “the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term.”(e) The department’s 2025 policy applies to all department health care facilities, including in California, where access to abortion is legal and protected by the state’s constitution.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that California’s veteran population has access to receiving abortion care in this state at no cost or reduced cost.SEC. 2. Section 127632 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:127632. (a) The California Reproductive Health Equity Program is hereby established within the department.(b) The purpose of the program is to ensure abortion and contraception are affordable for and accessible to all patients, regardless of their ability to pay, and to provide financial support for safety net providers of these services to offset the costs of providing uncompensated care to patients with low incomes and patients who are veterans who would otherwise lack access to care.SEC. 3. Section 127633 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:127633. (a) A Medi-Cal enrolled provider, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services, may apply for a grant, and a continuation award after the initial grant, under this chapter if they agree to provide abortion and contraception services in accordance with all of the following:(1) The abortion and contraception services provided are within the provider’s scope of practice and licensure.(2) The provider agrees to be identified, in a manner determined by the department, as a participating provider in the program. An institutional provider shall not be required to identify any individual who is an abortion provider as a condition of a grant awarded pursuant to this chapter.(3) To the extent services provided are covered pursuant to Section 14132 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the services shall be provided at no cost or a reduced cost to an individual with a household income at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level who meets both of the following criteria:(A) Is uninsured or has health care coverage that does not include both abortion and contraception.(B) Is not otherwise eligible to receive both abortion and contraception care at no cost through the Medi-Cal and Family PACT programs.(4) To the extent services provided are covered pursuant to Section 14132 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the services shall be provided at no cost or a reduced cost to an individual who is a veteran who meets both of the following criteria:(A) Has health care coverage that does not include abortion or is unable to access abortion or contraception care through the Department of Veterans Affairs health system.(B) Is not otherwise eligible to receive both abortion and contraception care at no cost through the Medi-Cal and Family PACT programs.(b) For purposes of this chapter, an individual’s self-declaration of income and source of health care coverage coverage, or veteran status, made to the provider at the time of service shall be all that is required to determine whether the individual may be able to access no-cost or reduced-cost services pursuant to this chapter.(c) This chapter does not require a provider to accept additional patients if, in the reasonable professional judgment of the provider, accepting additional patients would endanger access to, or continuity of, care for existing patients.(d) The department shall work with the State Department of Health Care Services to notify Medi-Cal enrolled providers of the availability of funding under this chapter, including any pertinent deadlines and other requirements.(e) For the purposes of this chapter, “veteran” means a person who served in the active military, naval, air, or space service of the United States or as a member of the National Guard who was called to, and released from, active duty or active service that was for a period of not less than 90 consecutive days and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, was discharged due to a service-connected disability within that 90-day period, or was discharged solely as a result of Executive Order No. 14183 issued on January 27, 2025.SEC. 4. Section 127634 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:127634. (a) An application for a grant under this chapter shall be made on a form to be developed by the department.(b) An application shall include both of the following:(1) A justification of the amount of grant funds requested, including both of the following:(A) The cost of uncompensated abortion and contraceptive services the applicant provided to patients with household incomes at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level and to patients who are veterans in the previous 12 months.(B) The anticipated cost of uncompensated abortion and contraception services to be provided to patients with household incomes at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level and to patients who are veterans in the upcoming 12 months.(2) Other pertinent information that the department requires.(c) The department shall develop an application form and shall begin accepting applications for grants pursuant to this chapter on or before January 1, 2023.(d) For purposes of subdivision (b), the cost of uncompensated abortion and contraception services shall:(1) Be calculated based on the amount the provider would expect to receive for providing these services to a patient enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.(2) Include those services provided through prescription, including laboratory and pharmaceutical, as well as services that are the result of complications related to services provided pursuant to this chapter, to the extent they would be covered pursuant to Section 14132 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(e) For purposes of this section, the department shall not require the submission of personal information about individuals receiving uncompensated abortion and contraception services as part of an application. Information required by the department shall only include information in summary, statistical, or other forms that do not identify particular individuals.(f) An application for a grant under this chapter shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).SEC. 5. Section 92 is added to the Military and Veterans Code, to read:92. The department shall publish a link to the abortion.ca.gov internet website on the women veterans resources page of the department’s internet website.SECTION 1.Section 123430 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:123430.(a)(1)To ensure people have accurate and comprehensive information when accessing abortion services in California, on or before July 1, 2023, the California Health and Human Services Agency, or an entity designated by the agency, shall establish an internet website where the public can access information on abortion services in the state.(2)The internet website established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include all of the following information and resources:(A)A person’s legally protected rights to an abortion under state law.(B)The location of abortion providers or links to the information in the state. Location information shall be posted and updated in a manner that allows people to easily identify the health care providers that provide abortion in the state.(C)Practical support services, such as airfare, lodging, ground transportation, gas money, meals, dependent childcare, doula support, and translation services, to help a person access and obtain an abortion.(D)Payment support resources, including coverage options, state programs, and other assistance that is available to help people with the cost of the abortion procedure.(E)General description of the available types of abortion.(F)Information to combat misinformation and disinformation, and ensure that people have comprehensive and medically accurate counseling and support services.(G)Any other information or resources that will assist an individual seeking comprehensive and accurate information about exercising their legal right to abortion and accessing abortion services in the state.(3)The agency shall consult with subject matter experts when determining the information and resources posted on the internet website. “Subject matter experts” includes, but is not limited to, the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls, the Department of Justice, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Managed Health Care, and organizations that represent patients, providers, and assistants that obtain, provide, or assist a pregnant person to access an abortion.(4)The internet website shall have mobile capabilities.(5)The internet website shall comply with Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), regulations implementing that act as set forth in Part 1194 of Title 36 of the Federal Code of Regulations, and any laws or regulations governing the accessibility of state internet websites.(6)The agency, in consultation with the subject matter experts, shall review the information and resources on the internet website to ensure that it is current and updated at reasonable intervals, but no less than once every six months. The internet website shall contain a feature to allow users to report erroneous or outdated information.(b)The internet website and informational materials created and distributed pursuant to this section shall be made available in a manner to ensure that they are accessible by all state residents. The internet website and informational materials shall be translated into Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, and Korean and in compliance with the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act (Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).(c)Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the internet website established pursuant to this section shall not include the name or location of any individual who is an abortion provider.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________